Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,173
Costs of setoffs; reimbursement.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall reimburse the Department of Revenue and the Department of Administrative Services for all reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Revenue and the Department of Administrative Services in setting off debts pursuant to sections 77-27,160 to 77-27,173.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 809;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 210.